District of Columbia statutes.
5-609

Appropriations authorized.

Appropriations to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including funds for the advancement of costs and expenses for the enforcement of recoveries, are hereby authorized.

Aug. 17, 1978, D.C. Law 2-100, § 10, 25 DCR 288
1981 Ed., § 4-509.
1973 Ed., § 4-1009.